District of Columbia statutes.
38-2706

Limit on aggregate amount of federal funds for public school and private school programs.

The aggregate amount authorized to be appropriated to the District of Columbia for the programs under §§ 38-2702 and 38-2704 for any fiscal year may not exceed—

(1)

$17,000,000, in the case of the aggregate amount for fiscal year 2003;

(2)

$17,000,000, in the case of the aggregate amount for fiscal year 2004; or

(3)

$17,000,000, in the case of the aggregate amount for fiscal year 2005.

Nov. 12, 1999, 113 Stat. 1323, Pub. L. 106-98, § 7
as added Apr. 4, 2002, 116 Stat. 118, Pub. L. 107-157, § 5(a)
This section is referenced in § 38-2702 and § 38-2704.